Alaska statutes. Title 27. Mining.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Sec. 27.21.900.
Mining by government agencies.

A federal, state, or municipal government agency, including a publicly owned utility or corporation, that proposes to engage in a surface coal mining operation that is subject to this chapter must comply with this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.900. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.910.
Exemptions.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the extraction of coal

by a landowner or lessee for the landowner’s or lessee’s own noncommercial use from land owned or leased by it;

for commercial purposes if the surface coal mining operation affects two acres or less; or

as an incidental part of highway or other construction financed in whole or in part as specified by regulation, by federal, state, or municipal government agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.910. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.920.
Experimental practices.

In order to encourage advances in mining and reclamation practices, and to allow post-mining land use for industrial, commercial, residential, recreational, or public purposes, the commissioner may, with the approval of the Secretary of the United States Department of the Interior, authorize departures in individual cases on an experimental basis from the environmental performance standards established under AS

27.21.210

.
The commissioner may authorize these departures if

the experimental practices are, during and after the surface coal mining operation, potentially more protective of the environment than, or at least as protective of the environment as, those required by this chapter and regulations adopted under it;

the surface coal mining operation for which the departure is authorized is not larger than necessary to determine the effectiveness and economic feasibility of the experimental practices; and

the experimental practices do not reduce the protection afforded public health and safety below that provided by law or regulation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.920. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.930.
Water rights and replacement.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to affect the right of a person to protect the person’s interest in water resources affected by a surface coal mining operation.

An operator shall replace the water supply of an owner of an interest in real property who obtains all or part of the owner’s supply of water for domestic, agricultural, industrial, or other beneficial use from an underground or surface source, if the supply has been affected by contamination, diminution, or interruption proximately resulting from the operator’s surface coal mining operation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.930. Renumbered in 1983. In 2008, in subsection (b), “an” was inserted before “interest” to correct a manifest error in ch. 29, SLA 1982.

Sec. 27.21.940.
Certification of blasters.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations requiring the training, examination, and certification of persons engaging in or directly responsible for blasting or the use of explosives in surface coal mining operations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.940. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

Sec. 27.21.950.
Civil actions.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person who is or may be adversely affected by a failure to comply with this chapter may commence a civil action in the superior court on the person’s own behalf and compel compliance with this chapter against

the commissioner, if the commissioner has failed to perform a nondiscretionary act or duty;

an instrumentality or agency of the state that is in violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted, or an order or permit issued, under this chapter; or

a person who is in violation of a regulation adopted or an order or permit issued under this chapter.

A person may not commence an action under (a)(1) of this section until 60 days after giving the commissioner written notice of the intended action in the manner prescribed by regulations adopted by the commissioner, except that an action may be brought immediately after the notice if the commissioner’s failure to perform constitutes an imminent threat to the health or safety of the person or would immediately affect a legal interest of the person.

A person may not commence an action under (a)(2) or (3) of this section

until 60 days after the plaintiff has given notice in writing of the violation to the commissioner and to the agency, instrumentality, or alleged violator;

if the state is diligently prosecuting a civil action in a state or federal court to require compliance with the provisions of this chapter or a regulation adopted or an order or permit issued under this chapter; however, any person may intervene in that civil action as a matter of right.

A person may commence an action under this section only in the judicial district in which the surface coal mining operation is located.

Nothing in this section restricts any right that a person or class of persons may have under statute or common law to seek enforcement of any of the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted under it or to seek any other relief, including relief against the commissioner.

A person who is injured or whose property is damaged by the violation by a permittee of a regulation adopted or an order or permit issued under this chapter may bring an action for damages, including reasonable attorney fees and expert witness fees, only in the judicial district in which the permittee’s operation is located. Nothing in this subsection affects the rights established by or limits imposed under AS 23.30.

In an action under this section, the commissioner may intervene as a matter of right.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.950. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.960.
Inconsistencies with federal act.

A provision of this chapter that is inconsistent with the provisions of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 as determined by the Secretary of the United States Department of the Interior under 30 U.S.C. 1255(b) is invalid from the date of the secretary’s determination.

If a provision of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 or of the regulations promulgated under that Act by the Secretary of the United States Department of the Interior is deleted, amended, set aside, enjoined, or declared invalid by Congress, the secretary, or in a final, unappealable judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction, then the commissioner shall review the changes made and make an appropriate recommendation as to whether changes in this chapter or the regulations adopted under it should be made.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.960. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.970.
Relationship to other laws.

Nothing in this chapter abrogates or modifies the power of a state agency to enforce laws and regulations within its jurisdiction, except as specifically stated in this chapter and regulations adopted under it. The commissioner shall coordinate permitting procedures to prevent unnecessary duplication in permit review.

Surface coal mining operations for coal that has been or is conveyed out of federal ownership must meet the requirements of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.970. Renumbered in 1983.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 29, SLA 1982, purported to add a subsection (c).
Section 7 of ch. 29 provided that the amendment take effect on the effective date of a version of Senate Bill No. 84; however, Senate Bill No. 84 did not pass the House of Representatives, and consequently, the amendment made by § 2 of ch. 29 never took effect.

Sec. 27.21.975.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the applicability of it to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the remainder of this chapter and the application of that provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Sec. 27.21.980.
Administrative Procedure Act.

Unless otherwise provided in AS

44.37.011

or other law, AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 118 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.980. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.998.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“alluvial valley floors” means the unconsolidated stream-laid deposits holding streams where water availability is sufficient for subirrigation or flood irrigation agricultural activities but does not include upland areas that are generally overlain by a thin veneer of colluvial deposits composed chiefly of debris from sheet erosion, deposits by unconcentrated runoff or slope wash, together with talus, other mass movement accumulation, and windblown deposits;

“applicant” means a person or other entity seeking a permit from the commissioner to conduct surface coal mining or underground mining activities under this chapter;

“coal” means all forms of coal, including lignite;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of natural resources or the commissioner’s authorized representatives or agents;

“department” means the Department of Natural Resources;

“imminent danger to the health or safety of the public” means the existence of a condition or practice, or a violation of a permit or other requirement of this chapter, in a surface coal mining and reclamation operation under which a rational person would not submit to exposure for fear of substantial physical harm;

“operation” means a surface coal mining operation or a surface coal mining and reclamation operation;

“operator” means a person engaged in coal mining who removes or intends to remove more than 250 tons of coal from the earth by coal mining within 12 consecutive calendar months in any one location;

“other minerals” means clay, stone, sand, gravel, metalliferous and non-metalliferous ores, and other solid materials or substances of commercial value excavated in solid form from natural deposits on or in the earth, exclusive of coal, and those minerals that occur naturally in liquid or gaseous form;

“permit” means a permit to conduct a surface coal mining and reclamation operation issued by the commissioner under the terms of this chapter;

“permit area” means the area of land indicated on the approved maps submitted by the operator with the application that must be covered by the operator’s bond as required by AS

27.21.160(a)

— (f) or by the individual performance and payment requirements for the operator who participates in the statewide bonding pool for mining operations as authorized by AS

27.21.160(g)

, and must be readily identifiable by appropriate markers on the site;

“permittee” means a person holding a permit to conduct a surface coal mining and reclamation operation or underground mining activities under this chapter;

“person” means an individual, partnership, association, society, joint-stock company, firm, company, corporation, or other business organization;

“reclamation plan” means a plan for the reclamation of an applicant’s proposed surface coal mining operation submitted by the applicant under regulations adopted under AS

27.21.110

;

“significant imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources” means a condition, practice, or violation that is causing or can be expected to cause an appreciable, reparable adverse impact to land, air, or water resources including, but not limited to, plant and animal life;

“surface coal mining and reclamation operation” means a surface coal mining operation and the activities necessary and incidental to the reclamation of that operation after August 3, 1977;

“surface coal mining operations” means

an activity

conducted on the surface of land in connection with a surface coal mine or, to the extent that the activity affects the surface of land, conducted in connection with an underground coal mine;

the products of which enter commerce or the operation of which directly or indirectly affects interstate commerce;

that may include contour, strip, auger, mountain top removal, boxcut, open pit, and area mining; the use of explosives and blasting; on-site distillation or retorting, leaching, or other chemical or physical processing of coal; and loading of coal for interstate commerce at or near the mine site;

other than an activity relating to the extraction of coal incidental to the extraction of other minerals under which the coal extracted does not exceed 16 2/3 percent of the total tonnage of coal and other minerals removed annually for purposes of commercial use or sale and other than a coal exploration activity subject to this chapter; and

the areas on which an activity described in (A) of this paragraph occurs or where the activity disturbs the natural land surface, including adjacent land, the use of which is incidental to the activity; and affected by the construction of new roads or the improvement or use of existing roads to gain access to the site of the activity and for haulage; and excavation, workings, impoundments, dams, ventilation shafts, entry ways, refuse banks, dumps, stockpiles, overburden piles, spoil banks, culm banks, tailings, holes or depressions, repair areas, storage areas, processing areas, shipping areas, and other areas upon which are situated structures, facilities, or other property or materials on the surface resulting from or incidental to the activity;

“Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977” means P.L. 95-87, 91 Stat. 447-532, 30 U.S.C. secs. 1201-1328, as amended;

“unwarranted failure to comply” means the failure of a permittee to prevent or abate a violation of a permit or of this chapter because of indifference, lack of diligence, or lack of reasonable care.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982; am § 6 ch 27 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.998. Renumbered in 1983. In 2008, in paragraph (6), to correct a manifest error in ch. 29, SLA 1982, “or safety” was substituted for “and safety” because “or safety” is the term used in this chapter.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The definition of “surface coal mining operations” in this section, and the regulations implementing this chapter, should be amended to apply to such operations which include the leaching or other chemical or physical processing of coal wherever that leaching or processing occurs, not just “on-site” activities. This will conform the state law to similar federal regulations. June 11, 1986, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 27.21.999.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Surface Coal Mining Control and Reclamation Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.999. Renumbered in 1983.